North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 7. Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

§ 143A-56.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The head of the Department is the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 95.

§ 143A-57.
Commissioner of Agriculture; powers and duties.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9.

§ 143A-58.
Commissioner of Agriculture; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested by law in the Commissioner of Agriculture are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 96.

§ 143A-59.
Board of Agriculture; transfer.

The Board of Agriculture, as contained in Article 1 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 97.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, rather than the Board of Agriculture, has the authority to select the midway operator, execute contracts and operate and manage the North Carolina State Fair. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Eric Miller Reeves, The North Carolina General Assembly, and The Honorable Alice Graham Underhill, The North Carolina General Assembly, 2002 N.C. AG LEXIS 6 (1/24/02).

§ 143A-60.
Structural Pest Control Division; transfer.

The Structural Pest Control Division of the Department of Agriculture, as contained in Article 4C of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 98.

§ 143A-61.
The North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame; transfer.

The North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame, as contained in Article 50B of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 99.

§ 143A-62.
Gasoline and Oil Inspection Board; transfer.

The Gasoline and Oil Inspection Board, as contained in Article 3 of Chapter 119 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 100.

§ 143A-63.
North Carolina Rural Rehabilitation Corporation; transfer.

The North Carolina Rural Rehabilitation Corporation, and board of directors, as contained in Chapter 137 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is transferred by a Type I transfer to the North Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 101; 2001-424, s. 17.2(a).

§ 143A-64.
North Carolina Board of Crop Seed Improvement; transfer.

The North Carolina Board of Crop Seed Improvement, as contained in Article 30 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 102.

§ 143A-65.
North Carolina Public Livestock Market Advisory Board; transfer.

The North Carolina Public Livestock Market Advisory Board, as contained in Article 35 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 9; 1997-261, s. 103.

§ 143A-65.1.
North Carolina Forest Service.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall have charge of the work of forest maintenance, forest fire prevention, reforestation, and the protection of lands and water supplies by the preservation of forests; it shall also have the care of State forests and State recreational forests.

History.

2011-145, s. 13.25(c); 2013-155, s. 23.

Transfer of Forestry Division and Forestry Council.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(d), provides: “All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Forestry Council are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2011-394, s. 21, as amended by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(ff), provides: “In order to ensure the ongoing delivery of services by the nonpoint source pollution control programs of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation, the Division of Water Resources in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall transfer Clean Water Act (CWA) Section 319 Nonpoint Source Management Program Base Grant funds to the Division of Forest Resources and Division of Soil and Water Conservation, where consistent with the federal grant program requirements, in an amount that is no less than the average annual amount of funding received by each of those two Divisions over the two most-recent fiscal bienniums.
In the event that the level of Section 319 base grant funds received by the Department of Environment and Natural Resources by the United States Environmental Protection Agency is increased or decreased in any funding cycle, the level of funding received by the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation shall be adjusted proportionally. Section 319 Nonpoint Source Management Program Competitive Grant funds shall consider water quality benefit and be distributed in a fair and equitable manner based on the grant requirements and the benefit.
The Division of Water Resources will establish a Workgroup of Nonpoint Source Agencies, including the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation, which will consider the competitive grant project proposals.
The Workgroup will be given full input to the project funding decisions.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-155, s. 23, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section heading, which formerly read “Division of Forest Resources.”

§ 143A-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 561, s. 116.

§ 143A-66.1.
Forestry Council — creation; powers and duties.

There is hereby created the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Forestry Council shall have the following functions and duties:

To advise the Commissioner of Agriculture with respect to all matters concerning the protection, management, and preservation of State-owned, privately owned, and municipally owned forests in the State, including but not limited to:

Profitable use of the State’s forests consistent with the principles of sustained productivity.

Best management practices, including those for protection of soil, water, wildlife, and wildlife habitat, to be used in managing the State’s forests and their resources.

Restoration of forest ecosystems and protection of rare and endangered species occurring in the State’s private forests consistent with principles of private ownership of land.

To maintain oversight of a continuous monitoring and planning process, to provide a long-range, comprehensive plan for the use, management, and sustainability of North Carolina’s forest resources, and to report regularly on progress made toward meeting the objectives of the plan.

To provide a forum for the identification, discussion, and development of recommendations for the resolution of conflicts in the management of North Carolina’s forests.

To undertake any other studies, make any reports, and advise the Commissioner of Agriculture on any matter as the Commissioner may direct.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 52; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(139); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 653, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.25(f), (g).

Transfer of Forestry Division and Forestry Council.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(d), provides: “All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Forestry Council are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

§ 143A-66.2.
Forestry Council — members; chairperson; selection; removal; compensation; quorum.

The Forestry Advisory Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall consist of 18 members appointed as follows:

Three persons who are registered foresters and who represent the primary forest products industry, one each from the Mountains, Piedmont and Coastal Plain.

One person who represents the secondary wood-using industry.

One person who represents the logging industry.

Four persons who are nonindustrial woodland owners actively involved in forest management, one of whom has agricultural interests, and at least one each from the Mountains, Piedmont, and Coastal Plain.

Three persons who are members of statewide environmental or wildlife conservation organizations.

One consulting forester.

Two persons who are forest scientists with knowledge of the functioning and management of forest ecosystems.

One person who represents a banking institution that manages forestland.

One person with expertise in urban forestry.

One person with active experience in city and regional planning.

The Governor shall appoint one person from categories (1) and (5), two persons from category (4), and the persons from categories (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10). The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint the person from category (2) and one person each from categories (1), (4), and (5). The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint the person from category (3) and one person each from categories (1), (4), and (5). The Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall consult with one another to insure that each of the three geographic regions of the State are represented in appointments made to fill categories (1) and (4).

The Governor shall designate one member of the Council to serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the Governor.

Members shall serve staggered terms of office of four years. The terms of office of members filling categories (1), (4), and (5) shall expire on 30 June of years that follow by one year those years that are evenly divisible by four. The terms of office of members filling categories (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) shall expire on 30 June of years that follow by three years those years that are evenly divisible by four. Terms shall expire as provided by this subsection except that members of the Council shall serve until their successors are appointed and duly qualified as provided by

G.S. 128-7

. Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Council created by the resignation, dismissal, death or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term and shall be made by the appointing authority responsible for that category. Vacancies in appointments made by the General Assembly shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

.

The Governor shall have the power to remove, in accordance with G.S. 143B-13, any member appointed by the Governor. The General Assembly shall have the power to remove, in accordance with G.S. 143B-13, any member appointed by the General Assembly.

Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

A majority of the Council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

All clerical and other services required by the Council, including the support required to carry out studies it is requested to make, shall be supplied by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 53; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(140); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 653, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.25(f), (h).

Transfer of Forestry Division and Forestry Council.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(d), provides: “All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Forestry Council are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

§ 143A-66.3.
Forestry Council — meetings.

The Forestry Council shall meet annually in October and at least three other times a year and may hold special meetings at any time and place within the State at the call of the chairperson or upon the written request of at least a majority of the members. At least one meeting during each two-year period shall be held in the Mountains, Piedmont, and the Coastal Plain.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 54; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 653, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.25(f).

Transfer of Forestry Division and Forestry Council.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(d), provides: “All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Forestry Council are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”